Utah statutes.
54-8c-4.   Violation.
(1)  Any responsible party who causes, permits, or allows a function or an
activity in violation of any provision of this chapter is subject to a civil
penalty in an amount not to exceed $1,000, to be imposed by any court of
competent jurisdiction against this party and in favor of the state.  If
imposed, the fine shall be paid into the General Fund.
(2)  Actions to recover the civil penalty under this section shall be brought
by a public utility or the county attorney of the county in which the
violation occurs.
(3)  A responsible party is liable to the public utility operating the high
voltage overhead line for all damages to the facilities and for all liability
incurred by the public utility as a result of any contact if:
(a)  the responsible party causes, permits, or allows a function or an
activity in violation of any provision of this chapter; and
(b)  as a result, a physical or electrical contact with a high voltage
overhead line occurs.
